District of Columbia statutes.
33-401

Repealed

Definition of terms.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 636, Pub. L. 87-709, § 2
Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-34, § 2(a), 40 DCR 5764
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1973 Ed., § 41-301.
1981 Ed., § 41-101.

D.C. Law 12-184, § 3 ( 45 DCR 7796), eff. March 26, 1999, amends §§ 41-101, 41-102 § 33-401, 33-402, 2001 Ed. without reference to their prior repeal.

Chapter repealed effective January 1, 1998: Section 1203 of D.C. Law 11-234 provided that §§ 41-101 through 41-148 §§ 33-401 through 33-448, 2001 Ed. are repealed effective January 1, 1998.